Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201468-970
Nebraska Regional Poison Center; legislative
findings.

The
Legislature finds that:

(1) The Nebraska Regional
Poison Center funded through the University of Nebraska Medical Center Cash
Fund provides a valuable service to Nebraska;

(2) The center receives over seventeen
thousand calls annually, seventy-two percent of the calls involve children,
and over twenty-seven percent of the calls relate to children in families
whose annual household income is at or below two hundred percent of the federal
poverty level;

(3)
The operation of the center has resulted in over ninety percent of the calls
regarding a child under six years of age being handled in a manner such that
the child was able to remain at home and the child did not have to visit an
emergency room or use 911 or emergency medical services; and

(4) The operation of
the center results in a cost savings of one hundred seventy-five dollars per
call in 1996 dollars.

Laws 2011, LB525, § 2.